Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Uniform Law on Paternity
§ 93-9-35.
Support by mother.

If a mother of a natural child be possessed of property and shall fail to support and educate her child, the court having jurisdiction, on the application of the guardian or next friend of the child or, if the child shall receive Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits or other financial assistance, of the county human services agent or youth counselor, may examine into the matter and after a hearing may make an order charging the mother with the payment of money weekly or otherwise for the support and education of the child.

The court may require the mother to give security, by bond or other security, with sufficient sureties approved by the court, for the payment of the order. In default of such security, when required, the court may commit her to jail, or put her on probation. At any time within one (1) year she may be discharged from jail, but her liability to pay the judgment shall not be thereby affected.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to relieve the father from liability for support and education of the child in accordance with the provisions of Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-15; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 15; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 93-9-37.
False declaration of identity.

The making of a false complaint as to the identity of the father, or the aiding or abetting therein, shall be punishable as for perjury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-16; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-39.
Probation.

Upon a failure to give security as provided herein, the court, instead of imposing sentence or of committing the father or mother to jail, or as a condition of his or her release from jail, may place him or her on probation, upon such terms as to payment of support to or on behalf of the child, and as to personal reports, as the court may direct. Upon violation of the terms imposed, the court may proceed to impose the sentence and commit or recommit to jail in accordance with the sentence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-17; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-41.
Appeals.

An appeal in all cases may be taken by the defendant, a guardian ad litem appointed by the court for the child, the mother or her personal representative, or the public welfare official, from any final order or judgment of any court having jurisdiction of filiation proceedings, as provided for in Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49, directly to the supreme court within thirty (30) days after the entry of said order of judgment.

No appeal however shall operate as a stay of execution unless the defendant shall give the security provided for in Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49, and further security to pay the costs of such appeal. If any such appeal shall be taken by a guardian ad litem, appointed for the child by the court, the court may in its discretion allow payment, for the actual disbursements made by the said guardian ad litem for taking appeal. When allowed by the judge and duly audited, said disbursement shall become a county charge and shall be paid by the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-18; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-43.
Prosecuting official.

It shall be the duty of the county attorney, in counties having a county attorney, (in the county in which the complaint is made) to prosecute all cases relating to natural children where the complainant is a state or county public welfare official. He shall receive as compensation for his services, when and if performed, not to exceed the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for any one month, in addition to compensation provided otherwise, out of the county treasury upon an order of the county, circuit, or chancery judge. In counties not having a county attorney, the complaint shall be prosecuted by the district attorney, or by an attorney representing the state or county public welfare official as the petitioner, who shall receive the same compensation as herein provided for the county attorney.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-19; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-45.
Costs.

If the court makes an order of filiation, declaring paternity and for the support and maintenance, and education of the child, court costs, including the cost of the legal services of the attorney representing the petitioner, expert witness fees, the court clerk, sheriff and other costs shall be taxed against the defendant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-20; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-47.
No explicit reference to illegitimacy to appear in certain records.

In all records, certificates or other papers hereafter made or executed, other than birth records and certificates or records of judicial proceedings in which the question of birth out of wedlock is at issue, requiring a declaration by or notice to the mother of a child born out of wedlock or otherwise requiring a reference to the relation of a mother to such a child, it shall be sufficient for all purposes to refer to the mother as the parent having the sole custody of the child, and no explicit reference shall be made to illegitimacy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 93-9-49.
Settlement agreements.

An agreement of settlement with the alleged father is binding only when approved by the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 383-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 312, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1962.